Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
HOME LOANS FOR LOW INCOME

HOME
BUYERS ON STATE LAND

Note

Part heading amended
by L 1971, c 192, §2.

§207-1 Authorization for loans. The
director of finance may grant loans as provided for in this part to persons
leasing or purchasing state lands for their personal residential needs. Loans
may be granted only to eligible persons as provided for in this part who occupy
state land by virtue of leases or agreements of sale executed after
July 13, 1961. [L 1961, c 194, §2; am L 1963, c 114, §1; Supp, §98L-2; HRS
§207-1]

Cross References

Disaster relief
commercial loans, see chapter 209, pt III.

Public lands for
natural disaster victims, see chapter 171, pt IIIC.

Residential
development by State, see chapter 206.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next